Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-19] Proceedings in more than one
state. Except for a petition for the appointment of a guardian in an
emergency or issuance of a protective order limited to property located in the
State of Hawaii under section 551G-14(a)(1) or (a)(2), if a petition for the
appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is filed in the
State of Hawaii and in another state and neither petition has been dismissed or
withdrawn, the following rules shall apply:

(1) If the court of the State of Hawaii has
jurisdiction under section 551G-13, it may proceed with the case unless a court
in another state acquires jurisdiction under provisions similar to section
551G-13 before the appointment or issuance of the order; and

(2) If the court of the State of Hawaii does not have
jurisdiction under section 551G-13, whether at the time the petition is filed
or at any time before the appointment or issuance of the order, the court shall
stay the proceeding and communicate with the court in the other state. If the
court in the other state has jurisdiction, the court of the State of Hawaii
shall dismiss the petition unless the court in the other state determines that
the court of the State of Hawaii is a more appropriate forum. [L 2012, c 236,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next